Wyoming, session 2025, HB0166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-403(a) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) is amended to read:
9-1-403. State auditor; duties; prohibited acts;
powers; investigative subpoenas.
(a) The state auditor shall:
(ix) Subject to state and federal law, make
available for public inspection and download on the state
auditor's official website information on all payments
within the purview of the state auditor's office made to
vendors. The information shall include, at a minimum, the
date of each payment, the vendor's name, the state agency
requiring items or services or from whose funds the payment
is made, the total amount paid and a description of the
payment. Payment information required under this paragraph
shall be posted to the state auditor's official website not
later than thirty (30) days after the payment is made by
the state auditor. Information published on the official
website under this paragraph shall be maintained on the
website for not less than five (5) years.
Section 2. This act shall apply to all payments made
by the state auditor on and after July 1, 2025.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0166
ENROLLED ACT NO. 18, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2